Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.500

Short title.

RCW * 31.04.501 through 31.04.540 may be known and cited as the Washington state reverse mortgage act.

[ 2009 c 149 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 31.04.501 was repealed by 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 14.